Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5146.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other general or special law to the contrary, the
Honorable Ana B. Quezada, may join Leslie Polanco and Daniel P. Nunez in marriage within the
City of Providence, Rhode Island, on or about February 5, 2025. The Honorable Ana B. Quezada
is hereby authorized and empowered to join the foregoing persons in marriage pursuant to and in
accordance with Chapter 3 of Title 15 of the General Laws, entitled “Solemnization of Marriages.”
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000874
========